California statutes. Education Code
From the funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of this chapter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, with the approval of the State Board of Education, shall administer this chapter and make apportionments to school districts to meet the total approved expense of the school districts incurred in establishing education programs for pupils who qualify economically and educationally in preschool, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 through 12, inclusive. Funds provided pursuant to this chapter in any fiscal year but not expended by school district in that fiscal year may be expended in subsequent fiscal years.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way preclude the use of federal funds for educationally disadvantaged youths. Districts which receive funds pursuant to this chapter shall not reduce existing district resources which have been utilized for programs to meet the needs of educationally disadvantaged students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

54003.

Under rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, participating school district governing boards shall evaluate the effectiveness of participating schools and shall terminate entitlements to schools which are unsuccessful over a four-year period in substantially meeting their objectives of the approved school site plan, as defined in Section 54004.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that to the extent feasible the State Board of Education develop rules and regulations that will assure consistency between subdivision (f) of Section 52034 and this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54004.1.

For fiscal year 1979–80 and each year thereafter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion funds available for programs in accord with procedures specified in this chapter and rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education. Funds shall be allocated to each district within its entitlement based upon the following:

(a) A district allocation plan developed pursuant to Sections 54004.3, 54004.5, and 54004.7, which shall be submitted to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and approved by the State Board of Education.

(b) A school plan, including any modification for each
 school receiving funds allocated pursuant to Sections 54004.5 and 54004.7, which has been approved by the governing board of the school district and is retained at the school site and at the school district office. This plan shall be available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction upon demand and shall be made available to the public on a reasonable basis pursuant to the provisions of the California Public Records Act, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code. The plan shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) An explicit statement of what the school seeks to accomplish.

(2) A description of the program and activities designed to achieve these purposes.

(3) A planned
 program of annual evaluation, including a statement of criteria to be used to measure the effectiveness of the program.

(c) Schools that provide programs pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52165 shall include those programs in the school plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 73.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

54004.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide all districts receiving impact aid with sufficient flexibility to design and administer an intra-district allocation system for impact aid which reflects the distribution and the needs of the needy population and assures the provision of services to students traditionally served by the educationally disadvantaged youth programs and bilingual education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54004.5.

Under the rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, school districts receiving entitlements for the 1979–80 year and thereafter under this chapter shall develop and submit to the Department of Education for approval an intra-district allocation plan for distribution of impact aid to schools with high concentrations of pupils in need. Such intra-district allocation plans shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A method for determining the eligibility of schools to receive impact aid based on the following factors which shall be given equal weight in the allocation of funds:

(1) The number or percentage of limited- and non-English-speaking youth at individual school sites.

(2) The number or percentage of students from low-income families at individual school sites as identified using data sources such as Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Federal Free Lunch, assessed value of single family residences, and census data.

(3) The number or percentage of students with low academic achievement at individual school sites. In the development of its allocation plan, an eligible district may employ, other factors unique to the district which further identify numbers or concentrations of pupils in need of impact aid at individual school sites. 

(b) A method for determining the minimum and maximum levels of service expressed as an
 average amount per pupil, for schools scheduled to receive impact aid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54004.7.

The intradistrict allocation plan shall assure adequate support to any school to provide programs appropriate to the educational needs of limited- and non-English-speaking pupils as required by Section 52165 except that programs funded under Article 3 (commencing with Section 52160) of Chapter 7 of Part 28 in fiscal year 1978–79 in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall continue to receive appropriate funding if the governing board determines that the program is of sufficient quality to warrant the funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 448.)
-------------------------------------------

54005.

The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations setting forth the standards and criteria to be used in the administration, monitoring, evaluation, and dissemination of programs submitted for consideration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54007.

In approving projects pursuant to this chapter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, with the concurrence of the Director of Finance, may, upon the request of the applicant district, designate a portion of the district’s entitlement which may be expended for noninstructional costs, including, but not limited to, costs for vandalism, security, and insurance. In no event, shall the total amount of funds designated for such purposes for all districts in the state exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

54008.

Expenditures pursuant to this chapter shall be considered to be categorical program expenditures within the meaning of Section 52165 and therefore subject to the requirements of the Chacon-Moscone Bilingual-Bicultural Education Act of 1976 (Article 3 (commencing with Section 52160) of Chapter 7 of Part 28 of Division 4 of this title).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Economic Impact Aid [54020. - 54029.]

54020.

It is the intent of the Legislature that funds authorized pursuant to this chapter replace, as of July 1, 1979, funds previously authorized to support educationally disadvantaged youth programs and bilingual education. To that end, the purpose of this article is to provide a method of impact aid allocation to be utilized by the Superintendent, that will allow efforts initiated under those programs to continue and expand so long as a need exists while previously unserved and underserved populations are provided with adequate aid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54021.

For the 2006–07 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following calculations for each school district:

(a) Using the methodology specified in Section 54023, determine the economic impact aid-eligible pupil count for each school district for the 2005–06 fiscal year as if Section 54023 had been in effect for that fiscal year.

(b) Divide the school district economic impact aid calculated funding in the 2005–06 fiscal year,
 excluding the minimum grant specified in Section 54031, as it read during that fiscal year, by the number calculated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For the purpose of calculating the economic impact aid allocations for the 2006–07 fiscal year, the quotient calculated in subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be the prior year economic impact aid per pupil amount for the 2006–07 fiscal year.

(d) For the purpose of establishing a base year economic impact aid per pupil amount pursuant to this section, if a school district received an allocation for the economic impact aid program in the 2005–06 fiscal year, but has no economic impact aid eligible pupils as determined in Section 54023 for that year, the school district shall be deemed to have a prior-year economic impact aid per pupil amount for the 2006–07 fiscal year that is equal to the statewide average economic impact aid per
 pupil amount for the 2005–06 fiscal year calculated for the state as a whole as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54021.1.

(a) The Superintendent shall make the following calculations for each school district:

(1) For the 2010–11 fiscal year, after calculating the economic impact aid allocation of each school district based on Section 54022, the Superintendent shall add to that allocation the amount the school district received, based on Section 404, for the English Language Acquisition Program in the 2009–10 fiscal
 year. A school district shall expend the funds added pursuant to this subdivision consistent with the parameters described in Section 54025 or Section 400, as it read on January 1, 2010.

(2) The Superintendent shall divide the total amount provided to each school district in the 2010–11 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) by the district’s total number of economic impact aid-eligible pupils in the 2010–11 fiscal year, calculated pursuant to Section 54023.

(b) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the amount calculated in subdivision (a) shall be the prior fiscal year economic impact aid per pupil amount for purposes of Section 54022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 24.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

54021.2.

(a) Commencing with the 2010–11 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a juvenile court school operated by a county superintendent of schools shall be eligible to receive economic impact aid funding.

(b) For the 2010–11 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall allocate to each juvenile court school operated by a county superintendent of schools the product of its economic impact aid-eligible pupil
 count calculated pursuant to Section 54023 multiplied by the current year economic impact aid statewide average per pupil rate for school districts based on subdivision (b) of Section 54021.1.

(c) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the allocation of each juvenile court school operated by a county superintendent of schools pursuant to the formulas described in Section 54022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 25.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

54022.

For the 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each school district shall receive the amount of economic impact aid determined by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), whichever is greater, calculated for each school district according to all of the following:

(a) Increase the prior fiscal year economic impact aid per pupil amount by the percentage change specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1 for the current fiscal year.

(b) Multiply the economic impact aid per pupil amount for the current fiscal year calculated in subdivision (a) by the economic impact aid-eligible pupil count for the current fiscal year as calculated in Section 54023.

(c) A school district shall, at a minimum, receive funds based on the number of economic impact aid-eligible pupils according to the following schedule:

(1) For the 2006–07 fiscal year, according to the following table:Number of economic impact aid-eligible pupilsAmount 0 None1–10 $5,50011 or more $8,300(2) For the 2007–08 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the minimum amounts for the schedule in paragraph (1) for the prior fiscal year shall be increased by the percentage change specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

54023.

For each fiscal year, the economic impact aid-eligible pupil count shall be calculated for each school district as follows:

(a) Determine the count of economically disadvantaged pupils, as defined in Section 54026.

(b) Determine the count of English learners, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 54026.

(c) Calculate an economic impact aid weighted pupil concentration
 factor:

(1) Add the pupil counts determined in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(2) Divide the fall CBEDS enrollment for the school district for the prior school year by two.

(3) Subtract from the sum calculated in paragraph (1) the quotient calculated in paragraph (2).

(4) If the result of the calculation in paragraph (3) is greater than zero, multiply that difference by 0.5. If the result is less than zero, it shall be deemed to be zero.

(d) The economic impact aid-eligible pupil count for each school district shall equal the sum of the pupil counts determined in subdivisions (a) and (b), and the weighted pupil concentration factor determined in subdivision (c).

(e) In calculating the economic impact aid-eligible pupil count for a new charter school in its first year of operation, the department shall use CBEDS enrollment counts and counts of English learners reported in the current year instead of the prior year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

54024.

The state board may, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 33050) of Chapter 1 of Part 20, waive any statutory provision or regulation regarding the use of funds apportioned pursuant to this article, provided that the funds are used in the same schools, or in schools with similar need levels, and the district demonstrates a reasonable case that the waiver will improve pupil services in those schools.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54025.

(a) A school district shall expend economic impact aid funds to serve and assist English learners and economically disadvantaged pupils and may not expend those funds at schoolsites that do not have English learners or economically disadvantaged pupils.

(b) A school shall use funds received pursuant to this article to support programs and activities designed to assist English learners achieve proficiency in the English language as rapidly as practicable and to support programs
 and activities designed to improve the academic achievement of English learners and economically disadvantaged pupils.

(c) Funds received by school districts pursuant to this article shall supplement, and not supplant, existing resources at the schoolsite.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54026.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Economically disadvantaged pupils” means either of the following, whichever is applicable:

(1) Pupils described in Section 101 of Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6333(c)(1)(A)(B)). Counts of
 the pupils described in this paragraph shall be the counts used in the current year apportionment calculations for purposes of Title I of the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.).

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for a small school district and for a juvenile court school operated by a county superintendent of schools, the product of the number of pupils eligible for participation in the free meals program for the prior fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (d), and the free meals adjustment factor. The free meals adjustment factor is the quotient, rounded to two decimal places, resulting from dividing the statewide total of economically disadvantaged pupils as defined in paragraph (1) by the statewide total of pupils eligible for participation in the free meals program for the prior fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (d).

(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or subparagraph (A), for charter schools that are funded through the block grant funding model pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 in the 2006–07 fiscal year, the department shall use counts as of October 2006 of pupils 5 to 17 years of age, inclusive, who are living with families whose annual income is at or below the federal poverty guideline, as collected through the first principal apportionment data collection process, as defined in Section 41601. Commencing in the 2007–08 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall use counts as of October of the prior year of pupils 5 to 17 years of age, inclusive, who are living with families whose annual income is at or below the federal poverty guideline, as collected through the first principal apportionment data collection process, as defined in Section 41601. For purposes of this subdivision, the department may use in the first year of operation of a charter school that is
 established on or after July 1, 2007, the current year counts of pupils 5 to 17 years of age, inclusive, who are living with families whose annual income is at or below the federal poverty guideline.

(C) The Superintendent may expand upon an existing process of collecting free or reduced price meal data in order to collect from small districts, as defined in subdivision (c), counts of pupils living with families whose annual income is at or below the federal poverty guideline.

(b) “English learner” means a pupil described in subdivision (a) of Section 306 or identified as a pupil of limited English proficiency, as that term is defined in subdivision (m) of Section 52163. Counts of the pupils described in this subdivision shall be the counts reported in the prior year language census.

(c) “Small school district” means
 a school district that has an annual enrollment of less than 600 pupils based on prior school year CBEDS data and is, for the purposes of this section, designated a rural school by the Superintendent based on the appropriate school locale codes, as used by the National Center for Education Statistics of the United States Department of Education.

(d) “Free meals” means the aggregate number of pupils meeting the income eligibility guidelines established by the federal government for free meals as reported for all schools for which the district is the authorizing agency.

(e) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the count of economically disadvantaged pupils for a charter school that is operated pursuant to Section 47612.1 shall be calculated without regard to the age of the pupil. A pupil who resides in program housing shall be considered a family of
 one.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 26.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

54027.

If a school district reorganizes either by unification or by consolidation with another school district of similar type, the Superintendent shall calculate an economic impact aid per pupil amount based on the respective per pupil amounts for each school district participating in the reorganization, weighted by the number of economic impact aid-eligible pupils contributed by each school district. The Superintendent shall use the appropriate data from the year prior to the year that the reorganization is effective for all purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54028.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of this article are subject to Sections 62002.5 and 62004, and to the portions of Section 62003 that relate to auditing the use of funds allocated for purposes of economic impact aid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

54029.

As a condition of the receipt of economic impact aid funds, a school district shall post in an easily accessible location on its Internet Web site data related to economic impact aid funding, for purposes of budget transparency, including all of the following:

(a) The amount of economic impact aid allocated to the school district in that fiscal year.

(b) The
 amount of economic impact aid used by the school district for administrative costs in that fiscal year.

(c) The amount of economic impact aid expended for limited-English-proficient pupils in that fiscal year and the prior fiscal year by the school district and by each school within the district.

(d) The amount of economic impact aid expended for state compensatory education in that fiscal year and the prior fiscal year by the school district and by each school within the district.

(e) The amount of unexpended economic impact aid and an explanation of why these funds have not been expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (SB 754)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Compensatory Education Programs for Disadvantaged Children [54400. - 54529.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [54400. - 54407.]

54400.

This chapter may be cited as the McAteer Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54401.

The Legislature finds and declares that because of home, community, environmental and other conditions which give rise to language, cultural and economic disadvantages, the latent talents of many minors in the elementary and secondary schools in the state remain undiscovered and are not adequately developed by the general educational programs afforded by the public school system and private schools or school systems. It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to encourage the establishment and development, by local officers and agencies of the public school system, of programs directed to identifying those pupils affected by language, cultural, and economic disadvantages who are potentially capable of completing the regular courses of instruction leading to graduation from the public elementary and secondary schools, and by special services, techniques, and activities to stimulating their interest in intellectual and educational attainment.

It is further recognized that to combat effectively the evils of such disadvantage a comprehensive, communitywide and statewide cooperative effort will be required together with a marshaling of all public and private resources and aids which may be useful in the endeavor. Securing cooperation, unity of action, and the concentration and effective direction of available outside resources and aids, public and private, should be an essential element of the programs for compensatory education, at both the state and local levels.

The Legislature finds that such special undertakings are essential to the conservation and development of the cultural, economic and intellectual resources of the state and nation. The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to carry out these intents and purposes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to sanction, perpetuate or promote the racial or ethnic segregation of pupils in the public schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54402.

For purposes of this chapter, a “disadvantaged minor” is a minor who is potentially academically able but scholastically underachieving, and must compensate for inability to profit from the normal educational program. He is a minor who:

(a) Is three years of age or more, but under 18 years of age and has not graduated from high school.

(b) Is potentially capable of successfully completing a regular educational program leading to graduation from the elementary or secondary school in which he is enrolled or required to be enrolled.

(c) Is, because of home and community environment, subject to such language, cultural, economic, and like disadvantages as will make improbable his completion of the regular program leading to graduation without special efforts on the part of school authorities, over, above, and, in addition to those involved in providing the regular educational programs, directed to the positive stimulation of his potential.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54403.

A “program of compensatory education” is an undertaking by any school district maintaining any of grades kindergarten through 12, in the form prescribed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 54420) of this chapter, which is over, above, and in addition to the regular educational programs of the district, having the purpose of providing positive stimulation of the intellectual abilities of disadvantaged minors, and which embodies a positive plan for the identification of such minors. Participation in a program of compensatory education under this chapter shall not preclude an individual’s participation in any other potentially beneficial program which may be offered in the public school system or otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54404.

Each county superintendent of schools is authorized, upon request, to provide consultative and coordination services for the school districts under his jurisdiction which have established programs of compensatory education under this chapter. Such activity shall be financed through the county school service fund, and shall be subject to budget review pursuant to Section 14050.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54405.

(a) The State Board of Education may establish programs of the following types:

(1) Establishment of new curricula or modification of existing curricula in connection with the education and training of prospective teachers, to incorporate instruction in methods and techniques developed by competent authorities designed to enable teachers effectively to teach disadvantaged children.

(2) Research and consultative work projects undertaken to assist state and local public school agencies in carrying out their responsibilities under this chapter.

(3) Independently, or in cooperation with any public or private agency or organization, engaging in research and development undertakings directed to overcoming disadvantage, together with related activities involving evaluation, demonstration, and dissemination of findings having to do with programs of compensatory education.

(b) It is the intent and aim of the Legislature that the University of California and the California State University participate to the extent practicable with local public school agencies and the State Board of Education in their endeavors under this chapter. It is recommended that greater attention be devoted in the training of teachers to their preparation in the techniques and skills required to cope with the problems of disadvantaged children at the preschool as well as the elementary and secondary level. The University of California and the California State University are urged to participate at the local level in the programs being administered by the local public school authorities and agencies, and to provide all technical and personnel services practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

54406.

All compensatory preschool programs operated by school districts, regardless of source of funds, shall be subject to the regulations of the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education is authorized to establish standards for all compensatory preschool programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54407.

The governing board of a school district, in its application, may request waiver of the provisions of any section or sections of this code for any compensatory education program if such waiver is necessary to establish and operate a program for low-income children. The need for a waiver shall be explained and justified in the application. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, at the discretion and upon recommendation of the Director of Compensatory Education, with the approval of the State Board of Education, may grant, in whole, or in part, any such request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Compensatory Education [54420. - 54425.]

54420.

The purpose of this article is to establish criteria to guide local school districts in making applications for federal funds under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as accepted in Sections 12400, 12402, 12403, 12404, Article 4 (commencing with Section 12030) of Chapter 1 of Part 8 of Division 1 of Title 1, or any state funds provided specially for the purposes of this chapter.

These criteria shall apply to the extent that they do not conflict with the provisions of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 or administrative regulations promulgated under that act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54421.

Each application of a local school district for federal funds or state funds shall include a comprehensive compensatory education plan which shall demonstrate that the district has fully utilized all other sources of funds, and the assistance of all volunteer aid offered by individuals and public and private organizations providing assistance for similar educational endeavors, and has effectively coordinated the same. This plan should emphasize a preventive program aimed at the child between the ages of three years and eight years, and have an ultimate goal of teaching the child to read, awakening the child’s interest in learning, giving the child a sense of success in school
 achievement, preventing the child’s alienation from the school, and preventing his possible early departure from school. It shall also include remedial programs for older children. Expenditures should be directed to schools with large concentrations of educationally disadvantaged children. If the situation involves disadvantaged children who speak English as a second language, any programs should include early English language instruction, and the use of teachers, teachers’ aides or volunteers who are proficient in the child’s primary language, and in-service training for teachers in that language.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54422.

For purposes of applications for federal funds a plan should be comprehensive in scope, and may include any or all of the program components set out below.

The State Board of Education shall act, upon recommendation of the Advisory Compensatory Education Commission, to establish a priority listing of the following program elements which shall be used in the approval of school district plans to determine those elements which shall be emphasized on a statewide basis:

(a) Reduction of ratios of pupils to teachers, directed specifically to enabling more individual attention
 to be given to disadvantaged pupils.

(b) Special efforts in the area of reading instruction, including the employment of additional teachers, special reading teachers, teacher aides, and volunteer aides. Special reading programs authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall be conducted pursuant to standards established under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 54100) of this part, Article 3 (commencing with Section 60604) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 of this division.

(c) Preschool programs provided through the use of either school facilities, other public or private facilities, or any combination thereof, for children three years of age or older, involving intensive parent participation, established pursuant to standards prescribed by the State Board of Education.

Preschool programs authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall be conducted
 pursuant to the educational standards established by the State Board of Education under Section 8253.

(d) In-service professional study involving instruction and orientation of school district personnel to enable them to more effectively deal with disadvantaged students.

(e) School-home cooperation, including home visitation, parent education and participation, parent-teacher conferences utilizing, wherever necessary, bilingual interpreters.

(f) Cultural enrichment including the use of field trips, special speakers, motion pictures, records, library programs, concerts and other means which serve to broaden the educational and cultural experience of the students.

(g) After-school tutoring programs utilizing the services of qualified college and
 university students and volunteers from the community.

(h) Remedial and corrective programs directed to enhancing the pupils’ interest and competence in the English language, including extended remedial reading programs, special speech and oral programs, and the teaching of English as a second language, as, for example, where Spanish-speaking children are involved.

(i) Evaluation, testing, and consultation, involving the formulation of evaluation standards which are as rigorous as feasible under the circumstances; the yearly administration of comprehensive achievement tests to all compensatory education students; and the development and use of data based on group controls which will provide evidence of contrast, and the assembly and classification of data for use at the statewide level. A school district plan of compensatory education under this chapter shall, in order to receive
 approval, contain this program element.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54423.

In addition, the district may propose other programs, subject to the approval of the Director of Compensatory Education, to include the following elements:

(a) Employment of competent school-community coordinators, to secure effective coordination of the efforts of pupils, parents, schools, and the community.

(b) Curriculum revision and the development and use of new instructional equipment and facilities to reorient the education program to meet the particular needs of the disadvantaged pupils, with special attention to be given to the teaching of
 the English language.

(c) Effective use of auxiliary personnel, the services of whom may be made available not only by the public school system, but by other public and private agencies and organizations, including ethnic organizations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54425.

(a) Whenever a districtwide school advisory committee on compensatory education programs has been established pursuant to a compensatory education plan, the procedures adopted for the selection of the district advisory committee shall specify that parents shall constitute a majority of the membership of the district advisory committee and shall require that the parent representatives be elected by the parents of pupils participating in a program of compensatory education residing in the district.

(b) Whenever a school advisory committee on compensatory education programs
 has been established pursuant to a compensatory education plan, the procedures adopted for the selection of the school advisory committee shall specify that parents shall constitute a majority of the membership of the school advisory committee and shall require that parent representatives be elected by the parents of pupils participating in a program of compensatory education at that school.

For purposes of this subdivision, a school advisory committee on compensatory education programs may designate a school site council established pursuant to Section 52012 or 52851 to function as the school advisory council on compensatory education for all purposes required by applicable statutory provisions and regulations for a period of up to two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 206, Sec. 11.   Effective May 18, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Migrant Children [54440. - 54445.]

54440.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A significant number of children under 18 years of age whose parents are migratory agricultural workers or migratory fishermen reside in California for at least a part of each year. These children, from among the least affluent segments of American society, tend to move frequently, attend school irregularly, and suffer health problems and language barriers. This results in many becoming early school dropouts, poorly prepared to enter the
 workforce or for academic success and upward social mobility.

(b) The problems of children of migratory agricultural parents and of migratory fisherman parents are of such magnitude and severity that local school districts have been unable to solve them with the resources normally available. It is, therefore, necessary for the state to aid local school districts through regional coordinating offices and the provision of special programs of educational and related services for these children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

54441.

The definitions set forth in this section shall govern the interpretation of this article.

(a) “Currently migratory child” means a child who has moved with a parent, guardian, or other person having custody, from one school district to another, either within the State of California or from another state within the 12-month period immediately preceding their identification as such a child, in order that the child, a parent, guardian, or other member of the immediate family might secure temporary or seasonal employment in an agricultural or fishing activity, and whose parents or guardians have been informed of the child’s eligibility for migrant education services.

“Currently migratory child” includes a child who, without the parent or guardian,
 has continued to migrate annually to secure temporary or seasonal employment in an agricultural or fishing activity.
